Utah statutes.
23-15-9.   Possession or transportation of live aquatic wildlife unlawful
except as authorized -- Exceptions.
It is unlawful for any person to possess or transport live protected aquatic
wildlife except as provided by this code or the rules and regulations of the
Wildlife Board.  This section shall not apply to tropical and goldfish species
intended for exhibition or commercial purposes.  Operators of a properly
registered private fish pond may transport live aquatic wildlife specified by
the Wildlife Board in the operator's certificate of registration.
